en: Hazelnut-based drinks, Hazelnut milks, Hazelnut drinks
da: hasselnødemælk
de: Haselnussmilch, Haselnussmilche, Haselnussmilchen, Haselnuss-Drinks, Haselnuss-Drink, Haselnussdrink, Haselnussdrinks
es: Leches de avellanas, Bebidas de avellanas
fi: Hasselpähkinäjuomat, Hasselpähkinämaidot
fr: Boissons végétales de noisette, Laits de noisettes
hr: Pića na bazi lješnjaka
it: Latti di mandorle
lt: Lazdyno riešutų pienas
nl: Hazelnootdranken

en: Macadamia nut-based drinks, Macadamia nut milks, Macadamia nut drinks
de: Macadamiamilch, Macadamiamilche, Macadamiamilchen, Macadamia-Drinks, Macadamia-Drink, Macadamiadrink, Macadamiadrinks
es: Leches de nueces de macadamia, Bebidas de nueces de macadamia
fr: Boissons végétales de noix de macadamia, Laits de noix de macadamia
hr: Pića na bazi makadamije
nl: Macadamianootdranken

en: Walnut-based drinks, Walnut milks, Walnut drinks
de: Walnussmilch, Walnussmilche, Walnussmilchen, Walnuss-Drinks, Walnuss-Drink, Walnussdrink, Walnussdrinks
es: Leches de nueces, Bebidas de nueces
fr: Boissons végétales de noix, Laits de noix
hr: Pića na bazi oraha
lt: Graikinių riešutų pienas
nl: Walnootdranken

en: Tigernut-based drinks, Tigernut milks, Tigernut drinks
de: Erdmandelmilch, Erdmandelmilche, Erdmandelmilchen, Erdmandel-Drinks, Erdmandel-Drink, Erdmandeldrink, Erdmandeldrinks, Tigernussmilch, Tigernussmilche, Tigernussmilchen, Tigernuss-Drinks, Tigernuss-Drink, Tigernussdrink, Tigernussdrinks
es: Leches de chufa, Bebidas de chufa
fr: Boissons végétales de souchet, Laits de souchet
hr: Pića na bazi tigrovog oraha
nl: Aardamandeldranken, Tijgernootdranken

en: Horchatas de chufa
de: Horchata de Chufa
es: Horchatas de chufa
fr: Horchatas de chufa
hr: Horchatas de chufa
nl: Horchatas de chufa

en: Frozen horchatas de chufa
es: Horchatas de chufa congeladas
fr: Horchatas de chufa surgelés
hr: Smrznuti horchatas de chufa

en: Frozen peas and carrots, Frozen garden peas and carrots
da: frosne ærter och gulerødder
fr: Petits pois et carottes surgelés
hr: Smrznuti grašak i mrkva
lt: Šaldyti žirneliai ir morkos
nl: Diepvries doperwten en worteltjes

en: Frozen cooked garden peas and carrots
fr: Petits pois et carottes surgelés cuits

en: Frozen mixed vegetables for ratatouille
da: frosne blandede grøntsager til ratatouille
fr: Légumes pour ratatouille surgelés

en: Frozen mixed vegetables for couscous
da: frosne blandede grøntsager til couscous
fr: Légumes pour couscous surgelés

en: Powdered plant milks, Powdered vegetable drinks, Powdered vegetable milks
es: Leches vegetales en polvo, Bebidas vegetales en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales en poudre, Laits végétaux en poudre
hr: Biljna mlijeka u prahu
lt: Augalinio pieno milteliai
nl: Plantaardige dranken in poedervorm
pl: Roślinne mleka w proszku, Roślinne napoje w proszku

en: Powdered cereal milks, Powdered cereal drinks
es: Leches de cereales en polvo, Bebidas de cereales en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de céréales en poudre, Laits de céréales en poudre
hr: Mlijeka od žitarica u prahu
nl: Graandranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered amaranth milks, Powdered amaranth drinks
es: Leches de amaranto en polvo, Bebidas de amaranto en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales d'amarante en poudre, Laits d'amarante en poudre
hr: Mlijeko od amaranta u prahu
nl: Amaranthdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered quinoa milks, Powdered quinoa drinks
es: Leches de quinoa en polvo, Bebidas de quinoa en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de quinoa en poudre, Laits de quinoa en poudre
hr: Mlijeko od kvinoje u prahu
nl: Quinoadranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered millet milks, Powdered millet drinks
es: Leches de mijo en polvo, Bebidas de mijo en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de millet en poudre, Laits de millet en poudre
hr: Proso mlijeka u prahu
nl: Gierstdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered oat milks, Powdered oat drinks
es: Leches de avena en polvo, Bebidas de avena en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales d'avoine en poudre, Laits d'avoine en poudre, lait d’avoine en poudre
hr: Zobeno mlijeko u prahu
nl: Haverdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered rice milks, Powdered rice drinks
es: Leches de arroz en polvo, Bebidas de arroz en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de riz en poudre, Laits de riz en poudre
hr: Rižino mlijeko u prahu
nl: Rijstdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered sesame milks, Powdered sesame drinks
es: Leches de sésamo en polvo, Bebidas de sésamo en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de sésame en poudre, Laits de sésame en poudre
hr: Susamovo mlijeko u prahu
nl: Sesamdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered teff milks, Powdered teff drinks
es: Leches de teff en polvo, Bebidas de teff en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de teff en poudre, Laits de teff en poudre
hr: Teff mlijeko u prahu
nl: Teffdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered wheat milks, Powdered wheat drinks
es: Leches de trigo en polvo, Bebidas de trigo en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de blé en poudre, Laits de blé en poudre
hr: Pšenično mlijeko u prahu
nl: Tarwedranken in poedervorm